Oklahoma, session 2026, SB214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 12-116, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 12-116. In the event the Governor or the Legislature


shall call for a special statewide election on any measure to be


submitted to a vote of the people, the election shall be held not


fewer than seventy (70) days nor more than two hundred fifty (250)


days from the date the election is called. Such special statewide


election may be on the same date as a primary or general election or


may be on some other date set by the Governor or the Legislature.


In the event the board of county commissioners or the governing body

Req. No. 817 Page 1


of a municipality or school district or technology center school


district or any other governmental subdivision calls for a special


election on any question, the election shall be held not fewer than


sixty (60) days from the date the election is called; provided, that


a special election called by a school or technology center school


district to be held on the date of the annual school runoff election


shall not be held fewer than forty-five (45) days from the date the


special election is called. A special election to fill a vacancy


for member of the board of education of a school district or to fill


a vacancy for municipal office shall be scheduled not fewer than


sixty (60) days from the date the election is called.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 34 O.S. 2021, Section 12, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 12. When an initiative or referendum petition has been


properly filed with sufficient signatures thereon, as provided in


this title, and all objections or protests have been resolved or the


period for filing such has expired, the Secretary of State shall, in


writing, notify the Governor, who shall issue a proclamation setting


forth the substance of the measure and the date on which the vote


will be held which shall be a date between seventy (70) days and two


hundred fifty (250) days after such notification. Such special


statewide election may be on the same date as a primary or general


election or may be on some other date set by the Governor.



Req. No. 817 Page 2


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 34 O.S. 2021, Section 25, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 25. Whenever any measure shall be initiated by the


people in the manner provided by law, or whenever the referendum


shall be demanded against any measure passed by the Legislature,


same shall be submitted to the people for their approval or


rejection at the next regular election; provided, the Governor shall


have power, in his or her discretion but in accordance with the


requirements of Section 12 of this title, to call a special election


to vote upon such questions, or to designate the mandatory primary


election as a special election for such purpose.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-817 TEK 12/30/2024 4:46:14 PM















Req. No. 817 Page 3